Hawaii statutes.
§560:2-203 Composition of the
augmented estate. Subject to section 560:2-208, the value of the augmented
estate, to the extent provided in sections 560:2-204, 560:2-205, 560:2-206, and
560:2-207, consists of the sum of the values of all property, whether real or
personal; movable or immovable, tangible or intangible, wherever situated, that
constitute the decedent's net probate estate, the decedent's nonprobate
transfers to others, the decedent's nonprobate transfers to the surviving
spouse or reciprocal beneficiary, and the surviving spouse's or reciprocal
beneficiary's property and nonprobate transfers to others. [L 1996, c 288, pt
of §1; am L 1997, c 383, §19]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next